Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska48-805
Commissioners; qualifications.

The commissioners shall not be appointed because they are representatives of either capital or labor, but they shall be appointed because of their experience and knowledge in legal, financial, labor, and industrial matters.

Laws 1947, c. 178, § 5, p. 589;

Laws 2007, LB472, § 4.